src/fst/morphology/affixes/clitics.lexc
!! Clitics
!  --------------------
!! Livvi Karelian clitics

LEXICON K
+Clt/gi:%>gi WORD-END "also / -kin" ;
!+Clt/hAi:%>h%{aä%}i WORD-END " / -hAn" ;
+Clt/hAi:%>häi WORD-END " / -hAn" ;
+Clt/bo:%>bo WORD-END " / -pA" ;
+Qst:%>go WORD-END " / -kO" ;
WORD-END ; 



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
